New York, session 2025-2026, A6903.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 27-f to
read as follows:
§ 27-f. Duty of libraries to implement programs to prevent workplace
violence. 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Library" shall mean any public, association, or free library, as
defined by section two hundred fifty-three of the education law, or
library having tax exempt status under section 501 (c) (3) of the United
States Internal Revenue Code, located in the city of New York or the
state of New York.
(b) "Library employee" means an individual who is employed by a
library.
(c) "Workplace" means any location away from a library employee's
domicile, permanent or temporary, where a library employee performs any
work-related duty in the course of such employee's employment by a
library.
(d) "Community violence interrupter" means individuals considered
credible messengers within a given community employed by a library,
whose main job function is focused on intervening before crises or
violence erupt and/or escalate, and who connect high-risk individuals to
extensive networks that provide job training, employment opportunities,
mental health services and/or legal services to increase the likelihood
of long-term violence reduction. Community violence interrupters are
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD07317-02-5

A. 6903--A 2
expected to mediate active or unfolding conflicts between community
members for the purpose of preventing or mitigating the occurrence
and/or escalation of violence.
2. Risk evaluation and determination. Every library shall evaluate its
workplace or workplaces to determine the presence of factors or situ-
ations in such workplace or workplaces that might place library employ-
ees at risk of workplace violence, consistent with section twenty-sev-
en-b of this article and section two hundred of this chapter. Such
factors shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) working late night or early morning hours;
(b) working alone or in small numbers;
(c) uncontrolled access to the workplace; and
(d) areas of previous security problems.
3. Written workplace violence prevention policy. (a) Every library,
regardless of site or type, shall develop and implement a written work-
place violence prevention policy for its workplace or workplaces that
includes the following:
(i) a list of the risk factors, such as those identified in subdivi-
sion two of this section, that are present in such workplace or work-
places;
(ii) the methods the library will use to prevent incidents of work-
place violence at such workplace or workplaces, including but not limit-
ed to the following:
(1) making high-risk areas more visible to more people;
(2) installing good external lighting;
(3) providing employee training; and
(4) establishing and implementing reporting systems for incidents of
workplace violence.
(b) Every library shall make the written workplace violence prevention
policy available upon request to its library employees, such library
employees' designated representatives, and the department. Library
employees shall be provided a written copy of the workplace violence
prevention policy upon hire. Such written policy shall be available in
English, Spanish and any other language requested by a library employee
within thirty days of such request.
4. Library employee information and training. The department, in
consultation with relevant groups as deemed necessary, shall produce a
model workplace violence prevention training program. Every library
shall utilize the model workplace violence prevention training program
pursuant to this subdivision or establish a workplace violence
prevention training program that equals or exceeds the minimum standards
provided by such model training program. The department's model training
program shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) information on the requirements of this section;
(b) examples of measures library employees can use to protect them-
selves when faced with workplace violence from customers or other
coworkers;
(c) de-escalation tactics;
(d) active shooter drills;
(e) emergency procedures;
(f) instruction on the use of security alarms, panic buttons, and
other related emergency devices;
(g) training for people in mental health crisis; and
(h) trauma and grief counseling support for employees.
5. Conduct of trainings. All training shall be conducted in English
as well as the primary languages spoken by library employees in the

A. 6903--A 3
workplace. Every library shall provide its library employees with such
workplace violence prevention training at the time of hiring and annual-
ly thereafter. When providing such workplace violence prevention train-
ing, each library shall also inform their library employees of the
details and location of the written workplace violence prevention policy
developed pursuant to this section. Each library shall include the risk
factors specific to such employer's workplace or workplaces, measures
library employees can take to protect themselves from such risks identi-
fied in such written workplace violence prevention policy, and any
procedures the library has implemented to protect library employees.
6. Documentation of workplace violence incidents. Every library shall
document each incident of workplace violence and shall maintain a copy
of such documentation for a minimum of three years after each incident.
Every library shall provide documentation of such incidents to the
department upon request and shall remove any personally identifying
information from such documentation before delivering it to the depart-
ment.
7. Annual review. Every library shall review the number and scope of
workplace violence incidents annually and shall make any necessary
changes to the written workplace violence prevention policy as
prescribed by subdivision three of this section.
8. Panic buttons. Every library shall install panic buttons at easily
accessible locations throughout the workplace or workplaces. For the
purposes of this section, "panic button" shall mean a physical button
that when pressed immediately dispatches local law enforcement to the
workplace. Libraries that identify a better or more immediate option
that provides the same protection may obtain permission from the depart-
ment to implement such alternate measure or measures.
9. Security guards and community violence interrupters. Libraries
that have experienced a certain number of violent incidents in their
workplace or workplaces in a given period of time, as determined by the
department, shall be required to have a security guard or community
violence interrupter present at the impacted location of such library
during all hours in which such library is open.
10. The provisions of this section shall not diminish any other obli-
gation of a library otherwise provided under law, rule, or regulation,
or under a collective bargaining agreement.
11. Within one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this
section, the commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to
implement the provisions of this section.
§ 2. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new
subdivision 63 to read as follows:
63. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations for the
protection and general well-being of library employees in public
libraries established under part two of article five of this title and
not-for-profit libraries having tax exempt status under section 501 (c)
(3) of the United States internal revenue code, consistent with the
provisions of section twenty-seven-f of the labor law.
§ 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall
have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or
repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of
this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed
on or before such effective date.